Utah statutes.
7-1-1004.   Reimbursement of financial institution for costs of obtaining
information.
(1)  A financial institution is entitled to reimbursement by a governmental
entity seeking information, for costs reasonably and directly incurred in
searching for, reproducing, or transporting a record required to be produced
if the financial institution produces the record:
(a)  pursuant to written permission by all account holders of the account
referenced in the record in accordance with:
(i)  Subsection 7-1-1001(2)(a); or
(ii)  Subsection 7-1-1006(2)(b)(iii);
(b)  in compliance with an order obtained under this part; or
(c)  in compliance with an order of a court or administrative body of
competent jurisdiction.
(2)  The commissioner shall by rule establish the rates and conditions under
which a governmental entity shall reimburse a financial institution.
